District of Columbia statutes.
7-2048

Injunctions.

(a)

The Corporation Counsel may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia to enjoin any violation of this subchapter.

(b)

Remedies established by this section shall be in addition to criminal sanctions, civil sanctions, or disciplinary action initiated by the Mayor.

(c)

In any proceeding brought pursuant to this section, it shall not be necessary to prove that any person has been injured by the violation alleged.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 19, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3638.
See notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.